Utah statutes.
30-1-4.5.   Validity of marriage not solemnized.

(1)  A marriage which is not solemnized according to this chapter shall be legal and valid if a court or administrative order establishes that it arises out of a contract between a man and a woman who:

(a)  are of legal age and capable of giving consent;

(b)  are legally capable of entering a solemnized marriage under the provisions of this chapter;

(c)  have cohabited;

(d)  mutually assume marital rights, duties, and obligations; and

(e)  who hold themselves out as and have acquired a uniform and general reputation as husband and wife.

(2)  The determination or establishment of a marriage under this section must occur during the relationship described in Subsection (1), or within one year following the termination of that relationship.  Evidence of a marriage recognizable under this section may be manifested in any form, and may be proved under the same general rules of evidence as facts in other cases.

